Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202485-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-2701 to 85-2706 shall be known and may be cited as the Veteran and Active Duty Supportive Postsecondary Institution Act.

Laws 2019, LB486, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB771, § 2.
March 19, 2024